Hawaii statutes.
[§523A-26] Deposit of funds. (a)
There is established in the state treasury the unclaimed property trust fund,
which shall be administered by the administrator. All moneys collected by the
unclaimed property program from holders of property presumed abandoned and all
proceeds from the sale of unclaimed property, less costs in connection with the
sale of the abandoned property, shall be deposited into the unclaimed property
trust fund.

(b) Moneys in the unclaimed property trust
fund shall be used for the payment of the following:

(1) Claims for the return of abandoned property to
their rightful owners;

(2) Payment to other states' unclaimed property
programs for owners whose last known address was in that other state;

(3) Any costs incurred in connection with the sale of
abandoned property;

(4) Costs of mailing and publication in connection
with any abandoned property;

(5) Reasonable service charges;

(6) Costs incurred in examining the records of
holders of property and in collecting such property from those holders; and

(7) Any other charges, costs, or expenses incurred in
the operation, administration, and enforcement of this part.

(c) Except as provided in section 523A-12,
moneys in the unclaimed property trust fund shall be invested by the administrator,
and all investment earnings shall be deposited to the credit of the general
fund.

(d) All unencumbered and unexpended moneys in
excess of $1,300,000 remaining on balance in the unclaimed property trust fund
on June 30 of each year shall lapse to the credit of the state general fund. [L
2008, c 55, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next